Massachusetts, session 194th, H2517.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 57 of Chapter 71 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended, by striking out, in line 21, the words “annually in grades
five through nine” and inserting in place thereof the following words :- “in grades 6, 7, 8, or 9.”
of 1